District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-115.06

Accreditation of training providers.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 7, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(g), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 36(b), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596
1981 Ed., § 6-997.6.